Utah statutes.
68-4-7.   Meetings -- Officers.

(1)  The commissioners shall meet at least once each year and shall organize by the election of one of their number as chair and another as secretary, who shall hold their respective offices for a term of two years and until their successors are elected.

(2)  The chair and secretary may be reelected for additional terms.



Amended by Chapter 356, 2011 General Session

